Louisiana, session 2026, HB275.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 14:34.9(I) and 35.3(I) are hereby amended and reenacted to read as
follows:
§34.9. Battery of a dating partner
* * *
I. This Subsection shall be cited as the "Dating Partner Abuse Child
Endangerment Law". Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, when
the state proves, in addition to the elements of the crime as set forth in Subsection
A of this Section, that a minor child thirteen years of age or younger was present at
the residence or any other scene at the time of the commission of the offense, the
offender, in addition to any other penalties imposed pursuant to this Section, shall
be imprisoned at hard labor for not more than three years. as follows:
(1) For a first offense, not less than one year nor more than three years at
hard labor.
(2) For a second or subsequent offense, not less than three years nor more
than six years at hard labor.
* * *
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 275 ENROLLED
§35.3. Domestic abuse battery
* * *
I. This Subsection shall be cited as the "Domestic Abuse Child
Endangerment Law". Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, when
the state proves, in addition to the elements of the crime as set forth in Subsection
A of this Section, that a minor child thirteen years of age or younger was present at
the residence or any other scene at the time of the commission of the offense, the
offender, in addition to any other penalties imposed pursuant to this Section, shall
be imprisoned at hard labor for not more than three years. as follows:
(1) For a first offense, not less than one year nor more than three years at
hard labor.
(2) For a second or subsequent offense, not less than three years nor more
than six years at hard labor.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.